Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 1 General Provisions

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659 § 19, which forms the basis for this article, reads as follows: “It is hereby declared to be the purpose of this Act to repeal and supersede all previous legislation upon the subject of the State Entomologist, his powers, duties and functions with respect to injurious insects, plant diseases and other kindred subjects formerly placed under his control, and supervision, (with the exception of the Act approved March 28, 1935 (Ga. Laws 1935, page 461) relating to the fraudulent sale of plants), to repeal and supplant all chapters and sections referred to and to be considered as exhaustive of the subject of the powers, duties and functions of the State Entomologist with respect to the aforesaid subjects.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Entomology and plant industry, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of the Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-4.

2-7-1.
Short title.

This article shall be known as “The Entomology Act of 1937.”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 1.

2-7-2.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Agent” means any person soliciting orders for or selling or distributing nursery stock under the partial or full control of a nurseryman or dealer.

“Dealer” means any person not a grower of nursery stock, who buys or otherwise acquires nursery stock for the purpose of reselling or distributing same independently of any control of the nurseryman.

Reserved.

“Nursery” means any grounds or premises on or in which nursery stock is grown, kept, or propagated for sale or distribution.

“Nurseryman” means any person engaged in the production of nursery stock for sale or distribution.

“Nursery stock” means all trees or plants or parts of trees or plants grown or kept for or capable of propagation, distribution, or sale.

“Persons” means individuals, associations, partnerships, and corporations, whether private, public, or municipal.

“Places” means vessels, aircraft, cars, trucks, automobiles, wagons and other vehicles, buildings, docks, depots, yards, nurseries, greenhouses, orchards, and other premises where material affected by this article is grown, produced, kept, stored, or handled.

(8.1)

“Plant pest” means any organism which is determined by the Commissioner to be injurious to the agricultural, horticultural, or other interests of the state, including, but not limited to, insects, bacteria, fungi, viruses, or weeds.

“Plants and plant products” means trees, shrubs, vines, forage and cereal plants, and all other plants, cuttings, grafts, scions, buds, and other parts of plants; and fruit, vegetables, roots, bulbs, seeds, wood, timber, and all other plant products. The term “trees” includes shade trees and all other trees except forest trees, jurisdiction as to which is vested in the State Forestry Commission, provided that the term “trees” includes nursery stock of all trees, including forestry trees.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 25; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, the “(3)” designation was added.

2-7-3.
Division of Entomology established.

There is established as a division of the Department of Agriculture the Division of Entomology, which shall be under the supervision of the chief entomologist appointed pursuant to Code Section 2-7-4 and shall be subject to the control and supervision of the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 360, § 3.

2-7-4.
Commissioner of Agriculture as ex officio state entomologist; designation of chief entomologist authorized.

The Commissioner shall be ex officio state entomologist.

The Commissioner is authorized to designate a chief entomologist, who must be a graduate of a recognized college of agriculture and shall have had courses in entomology and plant pathology and experience in field and administrative work in pest control while in the employment of one or more of the several states of the United States or in the employment of that branch of the federal government which is in charge of pest control. The chief entomologist shall serve at the pleasure of and shall be compensated in an amount determined by the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 360, § 2.

2-7-5.
Duty of Commissioner generally.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to protect the agricultural, horticultural, and other interests of the state from plant pests.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 2.

2-7-6.
Publication of information and advice.

The Commissioner may disseminate information and advice to the public on the prevention, control, or eradication of plant pests, by the publication and distribution of printed matter, by correspondence, and by other methods.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 3.

2-7-7.
Cooperative agreements.

The Commissioner may enter into cooperative arrangements with any person, municipality, county, or other department of this state and with boards, officers, and authorities of other states and of the United States for inspection with reference to plant pests and for the control and eradication thereof. The Commissioner may contribute a just and proportionate share of the expenses incurred under such arrangements.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 4.

2-7-8.
Purchases and expenditures.

The Commissioner may purchase all necessary materials, supplies, office and field equipment, and other things and may make such other expenditures as may be essential and necessary in carrying out this article, within the limits of the amount appropriated by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4.

2-7-9.
Investigations authorized; employment of experts; rental, lease, or purchase of land.

The Commissioner may carry on investigations of methods of control, eradication, and prevention of dissemination of plant pests and for that purpose may employ the necessary experts and may rent, lease, or purchase the necessary land, when required for this purpose.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 5.

2-7-10.
Inspection of plants and other things capable of disseminating or carrying plant pests.

The Commissioner may inspect or cause to be inspected by duly authorized employees or agents any plants, plant products, or other articles, things, or substances that may in the Commissioner’s opinion be capable of disseminating or carrying plant pests. For this purpose the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s employees and agents shall have the power to enter into or upon any place and to open any bundle, package, or other container containing or thought to contain plants or plant products or other things capable of disseminating or carrying plant pests.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 6.

2-7-11.
Nursery inspections; rules governing nursery stock and plants in transit.

The Commissioner may inspect or cause to be inspected all nurseries in this state at such intervals as the Commissioner may deem best. The Commissioner shall have a plenary power to make all rules and regulations governing nurseries and the movement of nursery stock therefrom or the introduction of nursery stock therein as the Commissioner may deem necessary in the eradication, control, or prevention of the dissemination of plant pests.

The Commissioner may also make rules and regulations:

To govern the sale and distribution of nursery stock by dealers and agents;

Under which nursery stock may be brought into this state from other states and territories of the United States or any foreign country; and

With reference to plants and plant products and other things and substances while in transit through this state as may be deemed necessary to prevent the introduction into, dissemination within, and establishment in this state of injurious plant pests.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 7.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Live plant regulations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Entomology and Plant Industry, Subject 40-4-9.

2-7-12.
Treatment, cutting, or destruction of infested trees, plants, or other things or substances.

The Commissioner may visit any section of this state in which any dangerous pest is supposed to exist and determine whether any infested trees, plants, or other things or substances are worthy of remedial treatment or shall be destroyed. The Commissioner may supervise or cause the treatment, cutting, or destruction of plants, trees, or other things or substances when deemed necessary to prevent or control the dissemination of plant pests or to eradicate same and may prescribe rules and regulations therefor.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 94, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 2123; Code 1933, § 5-706; Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 8.

2-7-13.
Interception and inspection of plants, plant products, or other things or substances in transit; disposition.

The Commissioner may intercept and inspect, while in transit or after arrival at destination, all plants, plant products, or other things or substances likely to carry plant pests being moved in this state or brought into this state from another state or territory of the United States or from any foreign country. If, upon inspection, such plants, plant products, or other things or substances are found to be infested or infected with an injurious plant pest or are believed to be likely to communicate or transmit same or are being transported in violation of any of the rules and regulations of the Commissioner, then such plants, plant products, or other things or substances may be treated if necessary and released, returned to the sender, or destroyed, their disposition to be determined under rules and regulations prescribed by the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 9.

2-7-14.
Demand for information; penalty.

The Commissioner may demand of any person who has plants or plant products or other things likely to carry plant pests in his or her possession to give full information as to the origin and source of the same.

It shall be a misdemeanor for a person to refuse to give the information demanded under subsection (a) of this Code section if he or she is able to do so.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 10.

2-7-15.
Declaration of public nuisance authorized.

The Commissioner may declare a dangerous plant pest, as well as any plant or other thing which has been infested or infected therewith or exposed to infestation or infection and is therefore likely to communicate the same, to be a public nuisance.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 11.

2-7-16.
Notice of declaration of nuisance; prescription of treatment; right of appeal.

Whenever inspection discloses that any places, plants or plant products, or other things or substances are infested or infected with any dangerous plant pest which has been declared a public nuisance under this article, the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s agents or employees shall give written notice to the owner or other person in possession or control of the place where such things are found, in person or by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery. Such owner or other person shall proceed to control, eradicate, or prevent the dissemination of such plant pest and to remove, cut, or destroy infested or infected plants and plant products or other things or substances within the time and in the manner prescribed by the notice or the rules and regulations made pursuant to this article or to take an appeal as provided in Code Section 2-7-24.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 94, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 2124; Code 1933, § 5-707; Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 7; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 12; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

2-7-17.
Treatment of nuisance by department where owner fails to act; lien for expenses; compensation not allowed.

Whenever an owner or other person cannot be found or fails, neglects, or refuses to obey the requirements of the notice given under Code Section 2-7-16 and the rules and regulations made pursuant to this article, such requirements shall be carried out by the inspectors or other employees or agents of the department. The Commissioner shall have and enforce a lien for the expense thereof against the place in or upon which such expense was incurred, in the same manner as liens are had and enforced upon buildings and lots, wharves, and piers, for labor and materials furnished by virtue of contract with the owner. No compensation shall be allowed for any trees or plants, plant products, or other things or substances that are destroyed.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 8.

Cross references.

Mechanics’ and materialmen’s liens generally, §

44-14-360

et seq.

2-7-18.
Judicial proceeding where owner refuses to act or to permit Commissioner to act; expenses and court costs.

In case any person or persons refuse to execute the directions of the Commissioner or refuse to allow the Commissioner or his agents to do so, the judge of the superior court of the county having jurisdiction over such person, upon complaint filed by the Commissioner or any citizen, shall cite the person or persons to appear before him within three days after notice is served. The judge may hear and determine all these cases. Upon satisfactory evidence, the judge shall cause the prescribed treatment to be executed. The expenses thereof and the costs of court shall be collected from the owner or owners of the affected material.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 94, § 6; Civil Code 1910, § 2125; Code 1933, § 5-708; Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 9.

2-7-19.
Investigation on citizens’ complaint; notice to owner; treatment or destruction of affected plants or other things or substances; costs.

When two reputable citizens of any county in this state notify the Commissioner, from belief, that noxious insects or plant diseases exist in their county, the Commissioner shall ascertain as speedily as possible the nature and extent of the condition reported. If, after such investigation, it is determined by the Commissioner that it is necessary or desirable for the public interest, he shall act with all due diligence to control or eradicate such insects or plant diseases by giving notice to the owner, tenant, or agent of the owner of such premises to treat such affected plants or other things or substances according to the methods he may prescribe or to destroy them within the period set forth in such notice. If, after the expiration of the period set forth in the notice, the affected materials or other things or substances have not been destroyed or treated as prescribed in the notice or the treatment has not been properly applied or is not effectual in ridding the affected materials, things, or substances of the pests, the Commissioner shall cause such affected materials, things, or substances to be properly treated or destroyed, as his judgment warrants. The cost of the work shall be assessed against the owner of the premises and shall be collected in the same manner as that provided in Code Section 2-7-17.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 94, § 14; Civil Code 1910, § 2132; Code 1933, § 5-714; Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 10.

2-7-20.
Declaration of quarantine; violation unlawful.

The Commissioner may declare a quarantine against any area, place, nursery, grove, orchard, county, or counties within this state, other states, or territories of the United States or any portion thereof or any foreign country, in reference to dangerous plant pests and may prohibit the movement within this state or any part thereof or the introduction into this state from other states or territories of the United States or any foreign country of all plants, plant products, or other things or substances from such quarantined places or areas as are likely to carry dangerous plant pests, if such quarantine is determined by the Commissioner, after due investigation, to be necessary in order to protect the agricultural, horticultural, or other interests of this state. In such cases the quarantine may be made absolute or rules and regulations may be adopted prescribing the method and manner under which the prohibited articles may be moved into or within, sold, or otherwise disposed of within or outside the state.

Whenever the Commissioner declares a quarantine against any place, nursery, grove, orchard, county, or counties of the state or against other states or territories of the United States or any foreign country, as to a dangerous plant pest, it shall be unlawful thereafter until such quarantine is removed for any person to introduce into this state or to move, sell, or otherwise dispose of within this state any plant, plant produce, or other things included in such quarantine, except under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, §§ 4, 13; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 13.

Cross references.

Power of director of State Forestry Commission to declare and fix boundaries of zones of infestation or infection upon determination of existence of infestation of forest insect pests or infection of forest tree diseases, §

12-6-16

.

2-7-21.
Registration of certain growers.

The Commissioner may provide for the registration of all growers of plant or nursery stock intended for sale or distribution, when such plants or nursery stock has been declared by the Commissioner as being liable or likely to disseminate or capable of disseminating plant pests.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 14.

2-7-22.
Assessment of costs.

For the purpose of defraying the expenses of the registration of nurserymen, dealers, agents, and plant growers and the certification and inspection of plants or plant products or other things, the Commissioner may assess and collect the cost thereof, any surplus to be paid into the state treasury.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4.

2-7-23.
Promulgation of rules and regulations; publication thereof.

The Commissioner may make such rules and regulations governing the conditions under which plants or other products may be produced as will permit such plants or other products to be certified as free or relatively free from plant pests.

Any rules and regulations made by the Commissioner relative to the certification of tomato, cabbage, onion, and all other cruciferous plants shall be published on or before December 15 of the year preceding that in which such plants are to be grown; provided, however, that in case of emergency supplemental rules and regulations may be promulgated and published; and provided, further, that certification of tomato, cabbage, onion, and other cruciferous plants shall not be compulsory on the grower.

All rules and regulations made by the Commissioner within the limits of the authority conferred by this article shall have the full force and effect of law. Printed copies of all acts, rules and regulations, quarantines, and notices of the department which are published under the authority of the Commissioner shall be admitted as sufficient evidence of such acts, rules and regulations, quarantines, or notices in all courts and on all occasions whatsoever, when the correctness of such copies is certified by the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 329, § 15.

2-7-24.
Administrative review of rules and notices.

Any person affected by any rule or regulation made or notice given pursuant to this article may have a review thereof as provided in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” for the purpose of having such rule, regulation, or notice modified, suspended, or withdrawn.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 6.

2-7-25.
Required compliance with article and rules.

It shall be unlawful for any nurseryman, dealer, or agent to sell, give away, carry, ship, or deliver for carriage or shipment any nursery stock, except in compliance with this article and the rules and regulations made pursuant thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 14.

2-7-26.
Importation of injurious insect or plant disease without permit prohibited.

The introduction into this state of any insect injurious to plants in any stage of development or of any specimen of any disease injurious to plants, except under a special permit issued by the Commissioner, is prohibited.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 11.

2-7-27.
Report of violations; investigation and disposition.

Any person, including a common carrier, who receives plants, plant products, or other things or substances sold, given away, carried, shipped, or delivered for carriage or shipment within this state, as to which this article and the rules and regulations made pursuant thereto have not been complied with, shall immediately inform the Commissioner or any employee or agent of the Commissioner and shall isolate and hold the plants, plant products, or other things or substances in question unopened or unused, subject to such inspection and such disposition as may be provided by the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 12.

2-7-28.
Act of agent imputed to principal.

In construing and enforcing this article, the act, omission, or failure of any official, agent, or other person acting for or employed by any association, partnership, corporation, or other principal within the scope of his employment or office shall in every case be deemed the act, omission, or failure of such association, partnership, corporation, or other principal, as well as that of the individual.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 16.

2-7-29.
Enforcement of article generally; criminal proceedings; subpoena powers.

The Commissioner may enforce this article and the rules and regulations made pursuant hereto by injunction in the proper court as well as by criminal proceedings. It shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorneys of all courts to represent the Commissioner when called upon to do so. In the discharge of his duties and in the enforcement of the powers delegated in this article, the Commissioner may issue subpoenas for the production of evidence, require production of books and papers, administer oaths, and subpoena and hear witnesses. To this end, it is made the duty of the various sheriffs throughout this state to serve all subpoenas and other papers upon the request of the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 4.

2-7-30.
Injunctions; violations declared public nuisances.

The Commissioner may institute action to enjoin any violation of this article or any rule or regulation or quarantine promulgated under this article. A violation of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this article or any quarantine established pursuant hereto is declared to constitute a public nuisance. Such action for injunction may be maintained notwithstanding the existence of other legal remedies and notwithstanding the pendency or successful completion of a criminal prosecution as for a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 255, § 1.

2-7-31.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision or requirement of this article or of the rules and regulations made thereunder or of any notice given pursuant thereto or who forges, counterfeits, defaces, destroys, or wrongfully or improperly uses any certificate provided for in this article or in the rules and regulations made pursuant hereto or who interferes with or obstructs any inspector or other employee or agent of the department in the performance of his duties shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 659, § 15.